Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2395.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin LAWNS TO LEGUMES; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Water and Soil Resources for the lawns to legumes program under Minnesota Statutes, section 103B.104. The board may enter into agreements with local governments, Metro Blooms, and other organizations to support this effort. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end